Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle C. Judicial Appraisal of Shares.

§79-4-13.30.
Court action.

If a shareholder makes demand for payment under Section 79-4-13.26 which remains unsettled, the corporation shall commence a proceeding within sixty (60) days after receiving the payment demand and petition the court to determine the fair value of the shares and accrued interest. If the corporation does not commence the proceeding within the sixty-day period, it shall pay in cash to each shareholder the amount the shareholder demanded pursuant to Section 79-4-13.26 plus interest.

The corporation shall commence the proceeding in the appropriate court of the county where the corporation’s principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state. If the corporation is a foreign corporation, it shall commence the proceeding in the county in this state where the principal office of the domestic corporation merged with the foreign corporation was located or, if the domestic corporation did not have its principal office in this state at the time of the transaction, in Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.

The corporation shall make all shareholders (whether or not residents of this state) whose demands remain unsettled parties to the proceeding as in an action against their shares, and all parties must be served with a copy of the petition. Nonresidents may be served by registered or certified mail or by publication as provided by law.

The jurisdiction of the court in which the proceeding is commenced under subsection (b) is plenary and exclusive. The court may appoint one or more persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend a decision on the question of fair value. The appraisers shall have the powers described in the order appointing them, or in any amendment to it. The shareholders demanding appraisal rights are entitled to the same discovery rights as parties in other civil proceedings. There shall be no right to a jury trial.

Each shareholder made a party to the proceeding is entitled to judgment (i) for the amount, if any, by which the court finds the fair value of the shareholder’s shares, plus interest, exceeds the amount paid by the corporation to the shareholder for such shares or (ii) for the fair value, plus interest, of the shareholder’s shares for which the corporation elected to withhold payment under Section 79-4-13.25.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.30; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 38; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 33, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2000 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (b).

Procedure for shareholder assertion of appraisal rights, see § 79-4-13.21.

Appraisal notice and form, see § 79-4-13.22.

Assessment of all costs of appraisal proceeding commenced under this section against corporation, see § 79-4-13.31.

Construction and operation of statute restricting corporation’s right to purchase its own stock to purchase from surplus. 61 A.L.R.3d 1049.

Place where corporation is doing business for purposes of state venue statute. 42 A.L.R.5th 221.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 700 et seq.

§79-4-13.31.
Court costs and expenses.

The court in an appraisal proceeding commenced under Section 79-4-13.30 shall determine all court costs of the proceeding, including the reasonable compensation and expenses of appraisers appointed by the court.The court shall assess the court costs against the corporation, except that the court may assess court costs against all or some of the shareholders demanding appraisal, in amounts which the court finds equitable, to the extent the court finds such shareholders acted arbitrarily, vexatiously or not in good faith with respect to the rights provided by this article.

The court in an appraisal proceeding may also assess the expenses of the respective parties in amounts the court finds equitable:

Against the corporation and in favor of any or all shareholders demanding appraisal if the court finds the corporation did not substantially comply with the requirements of Section 79-4-13.20, 79-4-13.22, 79-4-13.24 or 79-4-13.25; or

Against either the corporation or a shareholder demanding appraisal, in favor of any other party, if the court finds that the party against whom the expenses are assessed acted arbitrarily, vexatiously or not in good faith with respect to the rights provided by this article.

If the court in an appraisal proceeding finds that the expenses incurred by any shareholder were of substantial benefit to other shareholders similarly situated, and that such expenses should not be assessed against the corporation, the court may direct that such expenses be paid out of the amounts awarded the shareholders who were benefited.

To the extent the corporation fails to make a required payment pursuant to Section 79-4-13.24, 79-4-13.25 or 79-4-13.26, the shareholder may sue directly for the amount owed and, to the extent successful, shall be entitled to recover from the corporation all expenses of the suit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.31; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 39; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

The 2000 amendment, in (a), substituted “shareholders demanding appraisal” for “dissenters,” “such shareholders” for “the dissenters,” and “with respect to the rights provided by this article” for “in demanding payment under Section 79-4-13.28”; inserted “in an appraisal proceeding” in (b); substituted “shareholders demanding appraisal” for “dissenters” and “Sections 79-4-13.20, 79-4-13.22, 79-4-13.24 or 79-4-13.25” for “Sections 79-4-13.20 through 79-4-13.28” in (b)(1); substituted “shareholder demanding appraisal” for “dissenter” in (b)(2); rewrote (c); and added (d).

The 2007 amendment inserted “court” preceding “costs” throughout (a); substituted “assess the expenses of the respective parties” for “assess the fees and expenses of counsel and experts for the respective parties” in (b); deleted “fees and” proceeding “expenses” in (b)(2); in (c), substituted “expenses incurred by” for “services of counsel for,” “such expenses” for “the fees,” and “direct that such expenses” for “award to such counsel reasonable fees”; and substituted “all expenses of the suit” for “all costs and expenses of the suit, including counsel fees” at the end of (d).

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 705.